Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5749.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) This act does not prohibit a local unit of government from doing any of the following: (a) Prohibiting or regulating conduct with a pistol, other firearm, or pneumatic gun that is a criminal offense under state law. (b) Prohibiting or regulating the transportation, carrying, or possession of pistols, other firearms, or pneumatic guns by employees of that local unit of government in the course of their employment with that local unit of government. (c) Regulating the possession of pneumatic guns within in the local unit of government by requiring that an individual below the age of 16 who is less than 16 years of age who is in possession of a pneumatic gun be under the supervision of a parent, a guardian, or an individual 18 years of age or older, except that an ordinance shall not regulate possession of a pneumatic gun on or within in private property if the individual below the age of 16 who is less than 16 years of age is authorized by a parent or guardian and the property owner or legal possessor to possess the pneumatic gun. (d) Prohibiting an individual from pointing, waving about, or displaying a pneumatic gun in a threatening manner with the intent to induce fear in another individual. (e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), prohibiting the open carry of firearms inside a government building owned or leased by the local unit of government. (2) A local unit of government shall not prohibit the open carry of firearms by a law enforcement officer.